Vermont, session 2025-2026, H435.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 18 V.S.A. § 4222 is amended to read:
§ 4222. COMMON NUISANCES
(a) Unlawful conduct. Any store, shop, warehouse, dwelling house,
building, vehicle, boat, aircraft, or any place whatever, that is resorted to by
persons for the purpose of using regulated drugs or that is used for the illegal
VT LEG #380757 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.435
2025 Page 2 of 4
keeping or selling of the same, shall be deemed a common nuisance. No
person shall keep or maintain such a common nuisance.
(b) Civil penalty. A person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall
be assessed a civil penalty of not more than $50.00 for each day that the
property is in violation of subsection (a) of this section.
(c) Private right of action. Any person who has been injured by a violation
of subsection (a) of this section may bring an action in the Civil Division of the
Superior Court for damages, injunctive relief, punitive damages in the case of
an intentional violation, and reasonable costs and attorney’s fees.
(d) Civil enforcement; injunctive relief. If the Attorney General, a State’s
Attorney, or the municipality where the nuisance is located has reason to
believe that a person is violating or is about to violate subsection (a) of this
section and that proceedings would be in the public interest, the Attorney
General, State’s Attorney, or municipality may bring an action in the name of
the State or the municipality in the Civil Division of the Superior Court to
restrain the violation by temporary or permanent injunction. The courts are
authorized to issue temporary or permanent injunctions to restrain and prevent
violations of subsection (a) of this section.
Sec. 2. 4 V.S.A. § 1102 is amended to read:
§ 1102. JUDICIAL BUREAU; JURISDICTION
* * *
VT LEG #380757 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.435
2025 Page 3 of 4
(b) The Judicial Bureau shall have jurisdiction of the following matters:
* * *
(37) Violations of 18 V.S.A. § 4222, relating to keeping or maintaining
a common nuisance.
* * *
Sec. 3. 18 V.S.A. § 4252 is amended to read:
§ 4252. KNOWINGLY PERMITTING SALE OF REGULATED DRUGS IN
A DWELLING
(a) No person shall knowingly permit a dwelling, building, or structure
owned by or under the control of the person to be used for the purpose of
illegally selling a regulated drug.
(b) [Repealed.]
(c) A person who violates this section shall be imprisoned not more than
two years or fined not more than $15,000.00, or both.
(d) It shall not be a violation of this section if the person who owns or
controls the dwelling, building, or structure takes action to address the
unlawful activity.
(e) When a court imposes conditions of release for a violation of this
section pursuant to 13 V.S.A. § 7554, the court shall, in order to reasonably
ensure protection of the public, impose a condition that the defendant not
permit any person to be present on the property other than the tenant and the
VT LEG #380757 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.435
2025 Page 4 of 4
defendant. If the defendant is charged with violating this condition of release,
the court shall, in order to reasonably ensure protection of the public, impose a
condition of release pursuant to 13 V.S.A. § 7554 that the defendant not be
present on the property.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380757 v.1